District of Columbia statutes.
7-123

Administrative support.

The Department of Health shall assist with the administrative functions of the Mayor’s Council as feasible and as not otherwise provided.

Dec. 2, 2011, D.C. Law 19-58, § 4, 58 DCR 8969